North Carolina statutes. Chapter 96. Employment Security.
Article 2D. Administration of Benefits.

§ 96-15.
Claims for benefits.

Generally. — Claims for benefits must be made in accordance with rules adopted by the Division. An employer must provide individuals providing services for it access to information concerning the unemployment compensation program. The Division must supply
an employer with any printed statements and other materials that the Division requires an employer to provide to individuals without cost to the employer.

(a1)

Attached Claims. —
An employer may file claims for employees through the use of automation in the case of partial unemployment. An employer may file an attached claim for an employee only once during a benefit year, and the period
of partial unemployment for which the claim is filed may not exceed six weeks. To file an attached claim, an employer must pay the Division an amount equal to the full cost of unemployment benefits payable to the employee under
the attached claim at the time the attached claim is filed. The Division must credit the amounts paid to the Unemployment Insurance Fund.An employer may file an attached claim under this subsection only if the employer has
a positive credit balance in its account as determined under Article 2B of this Chapter. If an employer does not have a positive credit balance in its account, the employer must remit to the Division an amount equal to the
amount necessary to bring the employer’s negative credit balance to at least zero at the time the employer files the attached claim.

(a2)

Federal Disaster Declaration. —
An employer may file claims for employees through the use of automation in the case of unemployment due directly to a disaster covered by a federal disaster declaration.

Initial Determination. — A representative designated by the Division shall promptly examine the claim and shall determine whether or not the claim is valid. If the claim is determined to be not valid for any reason other than lack of base period earnings,
the claim shall be referred to an Adjudicator for a decision as to the issues presented. If the claim is determined to be valid, a monetary determination shall be issued showing the week with respect to when benefits shall
commence, the weekly benefit amount payable, and the potential maximum duration thereof. The claimant shall be furnished a copy of such monetary determination showing the amount of wages paid him by each employer during
his base period and the employers by whom such wages were paid, his benefit year, weekly benefit amount, and the maximum amount of benefits that may be paid to him for unemployment during the benefit year. When a claim
is not valid due to lack of earnings in his base period, the determination shall so designate. The claimant shall be allowed 10 days from the earlier of mailing or delivery of his monetary determination to him within which
to protest his monetary determination and upon the filing of such protest, unless said protest be satisfactorily resolved, the claim shall be referred to the Assistant Secretary or designee for a decision as to the issues
presented. All base period employers, as well as the most recent employer of a claimant on a temporary layoff, shall be notified upon the filing of a claim which establishes a benefit year.No claim for benefits may be withdrawn
by a claimant except upon the filing of a notice of withdrawal within 10 days from the earlier of mailing or delivery of his monetary determination to him and a finding of good cause by the Assistant Secretary or designee.At
any time within one year from the date of the making of an initial determination, the Division on its own initiative may reconsider such determination if it finds that an error in computation or identity has occurred in
connection therewith or that additional wages pertinent to the claimant’s benefit status have become available, or if such determination of benefit status was made as a result of a nondisclosure or misrepresentation of
a material fact.

Adjudication. — When a protest is made by the claimant to the initial or monetary determination, or a question or issue is raised or presented as to the eligibility of a claimant, or whether any disqualification should be imposed, or benefits denied
or adjusted pursuant to

G.S. 96-18

, the matter shall be referred to an adjudicator. The adjudicator may consider any matter, document or statement deemed to be pertinent to the issues, including telephone conversations, and after such consideration
shall render a conclusion as to the claimant’s benefit entitlements. The adjudicator shall notify the claimant and all other interested parties of the conclusion reached. The conclusion of the adjudicator shall be deemed
the final decision of the Division unless within 30 days after the date of notification or mailing of the conclusion, whichever is earlier, a written appeal is filed pursuant to rules adopted by the Division. The Division
shall be deemed an interested party for such purposes and may remove to itself or transfer to an appeals referee the proceedings involving any claim pending before an adjudicator.Provided, any interested employer shall
be allowed 10 days from the mailing or delivery of the notice of the filing of a claim against the employer’s account, whichever first occurs, to file with the Division its protest of the claim in order to have the claim
referred to an adjudicator for a decision on the question or issue raised. Any protest filed must contain a basis for the protest and supporting statement of facts, and the protest may not be amended after the 10-day period
from the mailing or delivery of the notice of filing of a claim has expired. No payment of benefits shall be made by the Division to a claimant until one of the following occurs:

The employer has filed a timely protest to the claim.

The 10-day period for the filing of a protest by the employer has expired.

A determination under this subdivision has been made. Provided further, no question or issue may be raised or presented by the Division as to the eligibility of a claimant, or whether any disqualification should be imposed, after 45 days from the first
day of the first week after the question or issue occurs with respect to which week an individual filed a claim for benefits. None of the provisions of this subsection shall have the force and effect nor shall the
same be construed or interested as repealing any other provisions of

G.S. 96-18

.An employer shall receive written notice of the employer’s appeal rights and any forms that are required to allow the employer to protest the claim. The forms shall include a section referencing
the appropriate rules pertaining to appeals and the instructions on how to appeal.

Appeals. — Unless an appeal from the adjudicator is withdrawn, an appeals referee or hearing officer shall set a hearing in which the parties are given reasonable opportunity to be heard. The conduct of hearings shall be governed by suitable rules adopted
by the Division. The rules need not conform to common law or statutory rules of evidence or technical or formal rules of procedure but shall provide for the conduct of hearings in such manner as to ascertain the substantial rights
of the parties. The hearings may be conducted by conference telephone call or other similar means provided that if any party files with the Division prior written objection to the telephone procedure, that party will be afforded
an opportunity for an in-person hearing at such place in the State as the Division by rule shall provide. The hearing shall be scheduled for a time that, as much as practicable, least intrudes on and reasonably accommodates the
ordinary business activities of an employer and the return to employment of a claimant. The appeals referee or hearing officer may affirm or modify the conclusion of the adjudicator or issue a new decision in which findings of
fact and conclusions of law will be set out or dismiss an appeal when the appellant fails to appear at the appeals hearing to prosecute the appeal after having been duly notified of the appeals hearing. The evidence taken at the
hearings before the appeals referee shall be recorded and the decision of the appeals referee shall be deemed to be the final decision of the Division unless within 10 days after the date of notification or mailing of the decision,
whichever is earlier a written appeal is filed pursuant to such rules as the Board of Review and the Division may adopt. No person may be appointed as an appeals referee or hearing officer unless he or she possesses the minimum
qualifications necessary to be a staff attorney eligible for designation by the Division as a hearing officer under

G.S. 96-4(q)

. No appeals referee or hearing officer in full-time permanent status may engage in the private practice of law as defined in

G.S. 84-2.1

while serving in office as appeals referee or hearing officer; violation of this prohibition shall be grounds for removal. Whenever an appeal is taken from a decision of the appeals referee or hearing officer, the
appealing party shall submit a clear written statement containing the grounds for the appeal within the time allowed by law for taking the appeal, and if such timely statement is not submitted, the Board of Review may dismiss the
appeal. (c1) Unless required for disposition of an ex parte matter authorized by law, the Division, appeals referee, or employee assigned to make a decision or to make findings of facts and conclusions of law in a case shall not
communicate, directly or indirectly, in connection with any issue of fact, or question of law, with any person or party or his representative, except on notice and opportunity for parties to participate.

(c2) Whenever a party is notified of the Board of Review’s or a hearing officer’s decision by mail,

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 6(e) shall apply, and three days shall be added to the prescribed period to file a written appeal.

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 727, s. 54.

(d1)
No continuance shall be granted except upon application to the Division, the appeals referee, or other authority assigned to make the decision in the matter to be continued. A continuance may be granted only upon
such terms and conditions as the Division by rule shall provide. Acceptable grounds for granting a continuance shall include, but not be limited to, those instances when a party to the proceeding, a witness, or counsel of record
has an obligation of service to the State, such as service as a member of the North Carolina General Assembly, or an obligation to participate in a proceeding in a court of greater jurisdiction.

Review by the Board of Review. — The Board of Review may on its own motion affirm, modify, or set aside any decision of an appeals referee, hearing officer, or other employee assigned to make a decision on the basis of the evidence previously submitted
in such case, or direct the taking of additional evidence, or may permit any of the parties to such decision to initiate further appeals before it, or may provide for group hearings in such cases as the Board of Review finds appropriate.
The Board of Review may remove itself or transfer to an appeals referee, hearing officer, or other employee assigned to make a decision the proceedings on any claim pending before an appeals referee, hearing officer, or other employee
assigned to make a decision. Interested parties shall be promptly notified of the findings and decision of the Board of Review.

Procedure. — The manner in which disputed claims shall be presented, the reports thereon required from the claimant and from employers, and the conduct of hearings and appeals shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the Division for determining
the rights of the parties, whether or not such rules conform to common-law or statutory rules of evidence and other technical rules of procedure.All testimony at any hearing before an appeals referee upon a disputed claim shall
be recorded unless the recording is waived by all interested parties. If the testimony is recorded, it need not be transcribed unless the disputed claim is further appealed and, one or more of the parties objects, under such rules
as the Division may adopt, to being provided a copy of the tape recording of the hearing. Any other provisions of this Chapter notwithstanding, any individual receiving the transcript shall pay to the Division such reasonable fee
for the transcript as the Division may by rule provide. The fee so prescribed by the Division for a party shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five cents (65¢) per page or sixty-five dollars ($65.00) per transcript. The Division
may by regulation provide for the fee to be waived in such circumstances as it in its sole discretion deems appropriate but in the case of an appeal in forma pauperis supported by such proofs as are required in

G.S. 1-110

, the Division shall waive the fee.The parties may enter into a stipulation of the facts. If the appeals referee, hearing officer, or other employee assigned to make the decision believes the stipulation provides
sufficient information to make a decision, then the appeals referee, hearing officer, or other employee assigned to make the decision may accept the stipulation and render a decision based on the stipulation. If the appeals referee,
hearing officer, or other employee assigned to make the decision does not believe the stipulation provides sufficient information to make a decision, then the appeals referee, hearing officer, or other employee assigned to make
the decision must reject the stipulation. The decision to accept or reject a stipulation must occur in a recorded hearing.

Witness Fees. — Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to this section shall be allowed fees at a rate fixed by the Division. Such fees and all expenses of proceedings involving disputed claims shall be deemed a part of the expense of administering this Chapter.

Judicial Review. — A decision of the Board of Review becomes final 30 days after the date of notification or mailing of the decision, whichever is earlier, unless a party to the decision seeks judicial review as provided in this subsection. Judicial
review is permitted only after a party claiming to be aggrieved by the decision has exhausted the remedies provided in this Chapter and has filed a petition for review in the superior court of the county in which the petitioner
resides or the county in which the petitioner’s principal place of business is located. The petition for review must explicitly state what exceptions are taken to the decision or procedure and what relief the petitioner seeks.
Within 10 days after the petition is filed with the court, the petitioner must serve copies of the petition by personal service or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the Division and upon all parties of record to
the Division proceedings. The Division must furnish the petitioner, upon request, the names and addresses of the parties as found in the records of the Division. The Division is a party to any judicial action involving any of its
decisions and may be represented in the judicial action by any qualified attorney who has been designated by it for that purpose. Any questions regarding the requirements of this subsection concerning the service or filing of a
petition shall be determined by the superior court. Any party to the Division proceeding may become a party to the review proceeding by notifying the court within 10 days after receipt of the copy of the petition. Any person aggrieved
may petition to become a party by filing a motion to intervene as provided in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 24.Within 45 days after receipt of the copy of the petition for review or within such additional time as the court may allow, the Division must transmit to the reviewing court the original or a certified copy
of the entire record of the proceedings under review. With the permission of the court the record may be shortened by stipulation of all parties to the review proceedings. Any party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to limit the
record may be taxed by the court for the additional cost incurred by the refusal. The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record when the court considers the changes desirable.

Review Proceedings. — If a timely petition for review has been filed and served as provided in G.S. 96-15(h), the court may make party defendant any other party it deems necessary or proper to a just and fair determination of the case. The Division may,
in its discretion, certify to the reviewing court questions of law involved in any decision by it. In any judicial proceeding under this section, the findings of fact by the Division, if there is any competent evidence to support
them and in the absence of fraud, shall be conclusive, and the jurisdiction of the court shall be confined to questions of law. Such actions and the questions so certified shall be heard in a summary manner and shall be given precedence
over all civil cases. An appeal may be taken from the judgment of the superior court, as provided in civil cases. The Division shall have the right to appeal to the appellate division from a decision or judgment of the superior
court and for such purpose shall be deemed to be an aggrieved party. No bond shall be required of the Division upon appeal. Upon the final determination of the case or proceeding, the Division shall enter an order in accordance
with the determination. When an appeal has been entered to any judgment, order, or decision of the court below, no benefits shall be paid pending a final determination of the cause, except in those cases in which the final decision
of the Division allowed benefits.

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 197, s. 9.

Irrespective of any other provision of this Chapter, the Division may adopt minimum regulations necessary to provide for the payment of benefits to individuals promptly when due as required by section 303(a)(1) of the Social Security Act as amended (42
U.S.C.A., section 503(a)(1)).

History.
Ex. Sess. 1936, c. 1, s. 6; 1937, c. 150; c. 448, s. 4; 1941, c. 108, s. 5; 1943, c. 377, ss. 9, 10; 1945, c. 522, ss. 30-32; 1947, c. 326, s. 23; 1951, c. 332, s. 15; 1953, c. 401, s. 19; 1959, c. 362, ss. 16, 17; 1961,
c. 454, s. 21; 1965, c. 795, ss. 20-22; 1969, c. 575, ss. 13, 14; 1971, c. 673, ss. 30, 30.1; 1977, c. 727, s. 54; 1981, c. 160, ss. 27-32; 1983, c. 625, ss. 10-14; 1985, c. 197, s. 9; c. 552, ss. 18-20; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c.
999, s. 6; 1989, c. 583, ss. 11, 12; c. 707, s. 4; 1991, c. 723, ss. 1, 2; 1993, c. 343, ss. 4, 5; 1999-340, ss. 6, 7; 2004-124, s. 13.7B(c); 2005-122, s. 1; 2006-242, s. 1; 2011-401, s. 2.16; 2012-134, s. 2(c), (d); 2013-2, s. 7(b);
2013-224, ss. 16, 17, 19; 2015-238, ss. 2.3(a), 2.9; 2017-8, s. 3.2(a); 2017-203, s. 6; 2018-94, ss. 2, 5(a); 2020-3, s. 1.4(a); 2021-5, ss. 4, 5, 6(a).

Cross References.

As to the confidentiality of records, reports, and information obtained from claimants and employers, see now

G.S. 96-4(x)

.

§ 96-15.01.
Establishing a benefit year.

Initial Unemployment. — An individual is unemployed for the purpose of establishing a benefit year if one of the following conditions is met:

Payroll attachment. — The individual has payroll attachment but because of lack of work during the payroll week for which the individual is requesting the establishment of a benefit year, the individual worked less than the equivalent of three customary
scheduled full-time days in the establishment, plant, or industry in which the individual has payroll attachment as a regular employee.

No payroll attachment. — The individual has no payroll attachment on the date the individual files a claim for unemployment benefits.

Unemployed. — For benefit weeks within an established benefit year, a claimant is unemployed as provided in this subsection:

Totally unemployed. — The claimant’s earnings for the week, including payments in subsection (c) of this section, would not reduce the claimant’s weekly benefit amount as calculated in

G.S. 96-14.2

.

Partially unemployed. — The claimant is payroll attached and both of the following apply:

The claimant worked less than three customary scheduled full-time days in the establishment, plant, or industry in which the claimant is employed because of lack of work during the payroll week for which the claimant is requesting benefits.

The claimant’s earnings for the payroll week for which the claimant is requesting benefits, including payments in subsection (c) of this section, would qualify the claimant for a reduced weekly benefit amount as calculated in

G.S. 96-14.2

.

Part-totally unemployed. — The claimant has no payroll attachment during all or part of the week, and the claimant’s earnings for odd jobs or subsidiary work would qualify the claimant for a reduced weekly benefit amount as calculated in G.S. 96-14.2.

Separation Payments. — An individual is not unemployed if, with respect to the entire calendar week, the individual receives or will receive as a result of the individual’s separation from work remuneration in any form. Amounts paid to an individual
for paid time off that was available, but unused, before the individual’s separation under a written policy in effect before the individual’s separation are not remuneration as a result of separation. If the remuneration is given
in a lump sum, the amount must be allocated on a weekly basis as if it had been earned by the individual during a week of employment. An individual may be unemployed, as provided in subsection (b) of this section, if the individual
is receiving payment applicable to less than the entire week.

Substitute School Personnel. — An individual that performs service in a school as a substitute is not unemployed for days or weeks when the individual is not called to work unless the individual was employed as a full-time substitute during the period
of time for which the individual is requesting benefits. For purposes of this subsection, a full-time substitute is an employee that works for more than 30 hours a week for the school on a continual basis for a period of six months
or more.

History.
2013-2, s. 7(b); 2013-224, s. 19; 2017-8, s. 2(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-8, s 2(a), in subsection (c), substituted “in any form” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and deleted former subdivisions (c)(1)-(6), which read: “(1) Wages in lieu of notice. (2) Accrued vacation pay. (3) Terminal leave
pay. (4) Severance pay. (5) Separation pay. (6) Dismissal payments or wages by whatever name.” For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 96-15.1.
Protection of witnesses from discharge, demotion, or intimidation.

No person may discharge, demote, or threaten any person because that person has testified or has been summoned to testify in any proceeding under the Employment Security Act.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be liable in a civil action for reasonable damages suffered by any person as a result of the violation, and an employee discharged or demoted in violation of this section shall be entitled to
be reinstated to his former position. The burden of proof shall be upon the party claiming a violation to prove a claim under this section.

The General Court of Justice shall have jurisdiction over actions under this section.

The statute of limitations for actions under this section shall be one year pursuant to

G.S. 1-54

.

History.
1987, c. 532, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Employment Law After Coman : Reaffirming Basic Rights in the Workplace,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 905 (1989).

For note, “Coman v. Thomas Manufacturing Co.: Recognizing a Public Policy Exception to the At-Will Employment Doctrine,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 1178 (1990).

§ 96-15.2.
Protection of witness before the Division of Employment Security.

If any person shall by threats, menace, or in any other manner intimidate or attempt to intimidate any person who is summoned or acting as a witness in any proceeding brought under the Employment Security Act, or prevent or deter, or attempt to prevent
or deter any person summoned or acting as such witness from attendance upon such proceeding, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
1987, c. 532, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 673; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2011, c. 401, s. 5.1.

§ 2D.
Board of Review.

Purpose. — The Board of Review (BOR) is created to determine appeals policies and procedures and to hear appeals arising from the decisions and determinations of the Division. The Department of Commerce must assign staff to the BOR. The BOR and its staff
must perform their job responsibilities independent of the Governor, the General Assembly, the Department, and the Division and in accordance with any written guidance promulgated and issued by the U.S. Department of Labor.

Members. — The BOR consists of three members appointed by the Governor and subject to confirmation by the General Assembly as provided in subsection (c) of this section. One member must be classified as representative of employees, one member must be
classified as representative of employers, and one member must be classified as representative of the general public. The member appointed to represent the general public will serve as chair of the BOR and must be a licensed attorney
in this State.Members of the BOR serve staggered four-year terms. A term begins on July 1 of the year of appointment and ends on June 30 of the fourth year. No individual may serve more than two terms on the BOR. In calculating
the number of terms served, a partial term that is less than 24 months in length will not be included. The General Assembly must set the annual salaries of the BOR in the current Operations Appropriations Act.

Confirmation. — Appointments of members to serve on the BOR are subject to confirmation by the General Assembly by joint resolution. The Governor must submit the name of the individual the Governor wants to appoint to the BOR to the General Assembly
for confirmation on or before May 1 of the year of the expiration of the term. If the General Assembly does not confirm the appointment by May 30, the office will be considered vacant and must be filled in accordance with subsection
(d) of this section. The Governor may not resubmit the name of the nominee whom the General Assembly did not confirm for the office. If the Governor fails to timely submit a nomination, the General Assembly will appoint to fill
the succeeding term as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

Vacancies. — For the purpose of this subsection, the General Assembly is not in session only (i) prior to convening of the regular session, (ii) during any adjournment of the regular session for more than 10 days, and (iii) after sine die adjournment
of the regular session. A vacancy in an office of the BOR prior to the expiration of the term of office must be filled in accordance with this subsection:

During legislative session. — If a vacancy in an office arises or exists when the General Assembly is in session, the Governor must submit the name of the individual to be appointed to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term within 30
days after the vacancy arises to the General Assembly for confirmation by the General Assembly. If the General Assembly does not confirm the appointment within 30 days after the General Assembly receives the nomination,
the office will be considered vacant and must be filled in accordance with this subsection. The Governor may not resubmit the name of the nominee whom the General Assembly did not confirm for the vacancy. If the Governor
fails to timely submit a nomination, the General Assembly will appoint to fill the vacancy as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

During legislative interim. — If a vacancy in an office arises or exists when the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor must appoint an individual to that office to serve on an interim basis pending confirmation by the General Assembly. The
Governor must submit the name of the individual to be appointed to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term to the General Assembly for confirmation within 14 days of the date the General Assembly convenes
or reconvenes for the next regular session. If the Governor fails to timely submit a nomination, the General Assembly will appoint to fill the vacancy as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

Legislative Appointments. — If the Governor fails to timely submit the name of an individual to be appointed to the BOR as provided in this section, then the General Assembly may appoint an individual to fill the vacancy in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

and the provisions of this subsection. If the vacancy occurs in an odd-numbered year, the appointment is made upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. If the vacancy occurs in an even-numbered
year, the appointment is made upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

History.
2015-238, s. 3.3(b).

§ 96-16.
Seasonal pursuits.

A seasonal pursuit is one which, because of seasonal conditions making it impracticable or impossible to do otherwise, customarily carries on production operations only within a regularly recurring active period or periods of less than an aggregate of
36 weeks in a calendar year. No pursuit shall be deemed seasonal unless and until so found by the Division; except that any successor under

G.S. 96-11.7

to a seasonal pursuit shall be deemed seasonal unless such successor shall within 120 days after the acquisition request cancellation of the determination of status of such seasonal pursuit; provided further that
this provision shall not be applicable to pending cases nor retroactive in effect.

Upon application therefor by a pursuit, the Division shall determine or redetermine whether such pursuit is seasonal and, if seasonal, the active period or periods thereof. The Division may, on its own motion, redetermine the active period or periods
of a seasonal pursuit. An application for a seasonal determination must be made on forms prescribed by the Division and must be made at least 20 days prior to the beginning date of the period of production operations for which
a determination is requested.

Whenever the Division has determined or redetermined a pursuit to be seasonal, such pursuit shall be notified immediately, and such notice shall contain the beginning and ending dates of the pursuit’s active period or periods. Such pursuits shall display
notices of its seasonal determination conspicuously on its premises in a sufficient number of places to be available for inspection by its workers. Such notices shall be furnished by the Division.

A seasonal determination shall become effective unless an interested party files an application for review within 10 days after the beginning date of the first period of production operations to which it applies. Such an application for review shall be
deemed to be an application for a determination of status, as provided in

G.S. 96-4

, subsections (q) through (u) of this Chapter, and shall be heard and determined in accordance with the provisions thereof.

All wages paid to a seasonal worker during his base period shall be used in determining his weekly benefit amount; provided however, that all weekly benefit amounts so determined shall be rounded to the nearest lower full dollar amount (if not a full
dollar amount).

A seasonal worker shall be eligible to receive benefits based on seasonal wages only for a week of unemployment which occurs, or the greater part of which occurs within the active period or periods of the seasonal pursuit or pursuits in which he earned
base period wages.

A seasonal worker shall be eligible to receive benefits based on nonseasonal wages for any week of unemployment which occurs during any active period or periods of the seasonal pursuit in which he has earned base period wages provided he has exhausted
benefits based on seasonal wages. Such worker shall also be eligible to receive benefits based on nonseasonal wages for any week of unemployment which occurs during the inactive period or periods of the seasonal pursuit
in which he earned base period wages irrespective as to whether he has exhausted benefits based on seasonal wages.

The maximum amount of benefits which a seasonal worker shall be eligible to receive based on seasonal wages shall be an amount, adjusted to the nearest multiple of one dollar ($1.00), determined by multiplying the maximum benefits payable in his benefit
year, as provided in

G.S. 96-14.3

, by the percentage obtained by dividing the seasonal wages in his base period by all of his base period wages.

The maximum amount of benefits which a seasonal worker shall be eligible to receive based on nonseasonal wages shall be an amount, adjusted to the nearest multiple of one dollar ($1.00), determined by multiplying the maximum benefits payable in his benefit
year, as provided in

G.S. 96-14.3

, by the percentage obtained by dividing the nonseasonal wages in his base period by all of his base period wages.

In no case shall a seasonal worker be eligible to receive a total amount of benefits in a benefit year in excess of the maximum benefits payable for such benefit year, as provided in G.S. 96-14.3.

All benefits paid to a seasonal worker shall be charged in accordance with

G.S. 96-11.2

.

The benefits payable to any otherwise eligible individual shall be calculated in accordance with this section for any benefit year which is established on or after the beginning date of a seasonal determination applying to a pursuit by which such individual
was employed during the base period applicable to such benefit year, as if such determination had been effective in such base period.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of any individual whose claim for benefits is determined in accordance herewith to appeal from such determination as provided in

G.S. 96-15

of this Chapter.

As used in this section:

“Pursuit” means an employer or branch of an employer.

“Branch of an employer” means a part of an employer’s activities which is carried on or is capable of being carried on as a separate enterprise.

“Production operations” mean all the activities of a pursuit which are primarily related to the production of its characteristic goods or services.

“Active period or periods” of a seasonal pursuit means the longest regularly recurring period or periods within which production operations of the pursuit are customarily carried on.

“Seasonal wages” mean the wages earned in a seasonal pursuit within its active period or periods. The Division may prescribe by regulation the manner in which seasonal wages shall be reported.

“Seasonal worker” means a worker at least twenty-five percent (25%) of whose base period wages are seasonal wages.

“Interested party” means any individual affected by a seasonal determination.

“Inactive period or periods” of a seasonal pursuit means that part of a calendar year which is not included in the active period or periods of such pursuit.

“Nonseasonal wages” mean the wages earned in a seasonal pursuit within the inactive period or periods of such pursuit, or wages earned at any time in a nonseasonal pursuit.

“Wages” mean remuneration for employment.

History.
1939, c. 28; 1941, c. 108, s. 7; 1943, c. 377, s. 141/2; 1945, c. 522, s. 33; 1953, c. 401, ss. 20, 21; 1957, c. 1059, s. 14; 1959, c. 362, s. 18; 1983, c. 585, s. 19; 2011-401, s. 2.17; 2013-2, s. 9(c); 2013-224, ss. 19,
20(k), (l); 2013-391, s. 7; 2015-238, s. 2.8(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-401, s. 2.17, effective November 1, 2011, substituted “Division” for “Commission” throughout the section; and substituted “except” for “Provided however” in the last sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2013-2, s. 9(c), in the second sentence of subsection (a), deleted “from March 27, 1953” following “Division; except that,” and substituted “G.S. 96-11.6” for “G.S. 96-8(5)b”; substituted “G.S. 96-14.4” for “G.S. 96-12(d) of this Chapter”
in subdivisions (f)(3), (f)(4) and (f)(5); and deleted “as prescribed in G.S. 96-9(c)(2) of this Chapter” following “charged” in subdivisions (g)(1) and (g)(2). For effective date and applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-224, s. 20(k), ( l ), effective June 27, 2013, substituted “G.S. 96-11.7” for “G.S. 96-11.6” in subsection (a); and substituted “subsections (q) through (u)” for “subsections (m) through (q)” in subsection (d).

Session Laws 2013-391, s. 7, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote subsection (g). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-238, s. 2.8(d), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “G.S. 96-14.3” for “G.S. 96-14.4” in subdivisions (f)(3) through (f)(5).